Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5185YC (4) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 80B.11D, subsections 3, 5, and 6, Code 1 2026, are amended to read as follows: 2 3. An individual who submits an application pursuant 3 to subsection 1 shall, at a minimum, submit proof of 4 successful completion of a two-year or four-year police 5 science or criminal justice program at an accredited 6 educational institution approved by the academy, and meet 7 the qualifications set forth in section 80B.11H, subsections 8 subsection 1 and or 3 . 9 5. This section applies only to individuals who apply for 10 certification through a short course of study level II academy 11 training program as established by rule. 12 6. An individual who has not been hired by a law enforcement 13 agency must be hired by a law enforcement agency within 14 eighteen months of completing the short course of study level 15 II academy training program in order to obtain certification 16 pursuant to this section . 17